Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.070

Lease of buses to transport children with disabilities and elderly—Elderly persons defined—Program limitation.

For purposes of RCW 28A.160.010 and 28A.160.040, "elderly person" shall mean a person who is at least sixty years of age. No school district funds may be used for the operation of such a program.

[ 1990 c 33 s 135; 1973 c 45 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.24.120.]